Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2276.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Chapter 11 of Title 61 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER EBOARDS OF PRISON INSPECTORSSec.1181. Definitions.1182. Establishment.1183. Membership.1184. Duties of board.1185. Board meetings.1186. Funding.1187. Annual report.123456789101112131415161718 § 1181. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subchapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." A board of prison inspectors established by this subchapter."Member." A member of a board.§ 1182. Establishment.A board of prison inspectors is established in each State correctional institution.§ 1183. Membership.(a) Composition.--Each board shall be composed of the following members:(1) Three medical professionals.(2) Three education professionals.(3) Three law enforcement officers.(4) Three county-elected officials from the county in which the State correctional institution is located.(5) Three community members:(i) one of whom must be a former inmate of the State correctional institution;(ii) one of whom must be a family member of an inmate at the State correctional institution; and(iii) one of whom must be an individual who resides in the county in which the State correctional institution is located.(b) Appointments.--(1) Members under subsection (a)(1) shall be appointed by the Department of Health.(2) Members under subsection (a)(2) shall be appointed 20260HB2276PN2976 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 by the Department of Education.(3) Members under subsection (a)(3) shall be appointed by the Commissioner of Pennsylvania State Police.(4) Members under subsection (a)(4) shall be appointed by the governing body of the county.(5) Members under subsection (a)(5) shall be appointed by the Governor, with confirmation from the Senate.(c) Qualifications.--A member must be representative of the broad segments of the county's population and whose background and experience indicate that the individual is qualified to act in the interest of the public.(d) Ineligibility.--A member may not be an employee of a State correctional institution or the Commonwealth.(e) Terms.--A member shall serve for a term of three years.(f) Compensation prohibited.--A member shall serve without compensation but is entitled to be reimbursed by the county for reasonable expenses incurred in the performance of the duties as a member.§ 1184. Duties of board.(a) General duties.--A board shall have the following duties:(1) To conduct unannounced inspections of the State correctional institution for which the board is established.(2) To review all information in the possession of the State correctional institution or the department relating to misconduct of a corrections officer currently or previously employed at the State correctional institution.(3) To review information in the possession of the State correctional institution or the department relating to complaints by inmates currently or previously incarcerated in 20260HB2276PN2976 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the State correctional institution.(b) Living conditions.--A board shall ensure that the living conditions within the State correctional institution for which the board is established and alternative housing facilities that provide services on behalf of the State correctional institution are healthful and otherwise adequate.(c) Unannounced inspections.--(1) A board shall, at least twice annually, conduct an unannounced inspection of the physical plant of the State correctional institution for which the board is established.(2) During the inspection, the board shall interview a cross section of inmates, out of the presence of the warden and the warden's agents, to determine the conditions within the State correctional institution and alternative housing facilities.(3) After an inspection, the board shall prepare a written report stating its findings and determinations and shall make the report available for public inspection and duplication in accordance with the act of February 14, 2008 (P.L.6, No.3), known as the Right-to-Know Law.(d) Operations to be consistent with law.--A board shall ensure that the State correctional institution for which the board is established is being operated in accordance with its regulations and the laws and regulations of the United States and this Commonwealth.(e) Investigations.--(1) A board shall investigate allegations of inadequate conditions in the State correctional institution for which the board is established and improper practices occurring within the State correctional institution and may conduct 20260HB2276PN2976 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 other investigations or reviews of the State correctional institution's operations and maintenance.(2) The books, papers and records of the State correctional institution, including the papers and records of the warden and relating to individual inmates, shall be open for inspection by the board.§ 1185. Board meetings.(a) Quorum.--A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business and all actions of the board shall be by the approval of a majority of all members of the board.(b) Frequency.--(1) A board shall meet quarterly to discuss and review information obtained during the course of its operations as well as any recommendations for improved operations and conditions in the State correctional institution for which the board is established.(2) Meetings of the board shall be publicly accessible.§ 1186. Funding.The administrative expenses of a board shall be funded by appropriations to the department for that purpose.§ 1187. Annual report.(a) Duty of board.--A board shall prepare an annual report documenting the following:(1) Conditions in the State correctional institution for which the board is established.(2) Information obtained during the course of its operations, as well as any recommendations for improved operations and conditions in the State correctional institution.20260HB2276PN2976 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) Availability.--The annual report shall be available for public inspection on the department's publicly accessible Internet website.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2276PN2976 - 6 - 1234